Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2625.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "applicant" in section 9301 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Applicant." A person who, on his own behalf or on behalf of another, is applying for [permission to engage in an act or activity which is regulated under the provisions of this chapter.] a license relating to the care or training of horses, <--<--1234567891011121314151617 racing, wagering, security or the management of licensed racing entities in accordance with section 9318 (relating to licenses for horse race meetings) or 9323 (relating to occupational licenses for individuals). If the applicant is a person other than an individual, the commission shall determine the associated persons whose qualifications are necessary as a precondition to the licensing of the applicant.* * *Section 2. Section 9312(2)(ii), (iii) and (iv) of Title 3 are amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 9312(2)(II), (III) AND (IV) OF TITLE 3 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED AND THE PARAGRAPH IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBPARAGRAPH TO READ:§ 9312. Additional powers of commission.The commission shall regulate horse racing at which pari-mutuel wagering is conducted and approve the number of racing days allocated to each licensed racing entity. In addition to any other powers of the commission:* * *(2) The following shall apply:* * *(ii) The applicant must submit a full set of fingerprints to the Pennsylvania State Police [or the Pennsylvania State Police's authorized agent] for the purpose of a State criminal history record check. The Pennsylvania State Police [or the Pennsylvania State Police's authorized agent must then] shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of verifying the identity of the applicant and obtaining a current record of any criminal arrests 20260HB2625PN3751 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and convictions.(iii) The commission shall consider information obtained under this paragraph for the purpose of screening applicants for fitness for licensure in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The information obtained under this paragraph shall not be limited by 18 Pa.C.S. § 9121(b) (relating to general regulations).(iv) National criminal history record information received by the commission shall be handled and maintained in accordance with Federal [Bureau of Investigation policy] law.* * *(VIII) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE TERM "APPLICANT" SHALL MEAN AN INDIVIDUAL APPLYING FOR A LICENSE RELATING TO:(A) THE CARE OR TRAINING OF HORSES;(B) RACING;(C) PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING SYSTEMS;(D) SECURITY; OR(E) THE MANAGEMENT OF LICENSED RACING ENTITIES, INCLUDING OFFICERS AND DIRECTORS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTIONS 9318 (RELATING TO LICENSES FOR HORSE RACE MEETINGS) AND 9323 (RELATING TO OCCUPATIONAL LICENSES FOR INDIVIDUALS), INCLUDING:(I) HORSE OWNERS;(II) HORSE TRAINERS;(III) DRIVERS;(IV) JOCKEYS;(V) EXERCISE RIDERS;20260HB2625PN3751 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (VI) GROOMS;(VII) STABLE EMPLOYEES;(VIII) JUDGES;(IX) STEWARDS;(X) COMMISSION AND RACETRACK VETERINARIANS;(XI) RACING SECRETARIES;(XII) FARRIERS AND BLACKSMITHS;(XIII) OFFICIAL STARTERS;(XIV) CLERK OF SCALES; AND(XV) PATROL JUDGES.* * *Section 3 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2625PN3751 - 4 - <--123456789101112